Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-501
Session laws and journals; distribution by Secretary of State; section, termination.

The Secretary of State is authorized to distribute the laws and journals of the state.

This section terminates on January 1, 2027.

Laws 1907, c. 78, § 1, p. 289;

R.S.1913, § 3733;

Laws 1915, c. 72, § 1, p. 185;

C.S.1922, § 3126;

C.S.1929, § 49-501;

R.S.1943, § 49-501;

Laws 1977, LB 3, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 2.
July 18, 2026